New York, session 2025-2026, S2291.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 469 of the real property tax law, 2 as added by chapter 377 of the laws of 2000, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 3. Such exemption shall be applicable [only to construction or recon- 5 struction which occurred subsequent to the effective date of this 6 section and shall only apply] during taxable years during which at least 7 one such parent or grandparent maintains a primary place of residence in 8 such living quarters. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05276-01-5